src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-izaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - izā: # Noun 25 'eng /est isa/fin' - full paradigm
     izā+N+Sg+Nom: izā
     izā+N+Sg+Gen: izā
     izā+N+Sg+Par: [iʼzzõ, izzõ]
     izā+N+Sg+Dat: izān
     izā+N+Sg+Ins: izāks
     izā+N+Sg+Ill: [iʼzzõ, izzõ]
     izā+N+Sg+Ela: izāst
     izā+N+Pl+Nom: izād
     izā+N+Pl+Gen: izād
     izā+N+Pl+Par: [iʼžḑi, ižḑi]
     izā+N+Pl+Dat: izādõn
     izā+N+Pl+Ins: izādõks
     izā+N+Pl+Ill: izīž
     izā+N+Pl+Ela: izīst
